Wyoming, session 2025, SF0034.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(G)(II) and
21-15-109(c)(iii)(C), (vi) and (vii)(intro) are amended to
read:
21-13-309. Determination of amount to be included in
foundation program for each district.
(m) In determining the amount to be included in the
foundation program for each district, the state
superintendent shall:
(v) Based upon ADM computations and identified
school configurations within each district pursuant to
paragraph (iv) of this subsection, compute the foundation
program amount for each district as prescribed by the
education resource block grant model adopted by the Wyoming
legislature as defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv), as
contained within the spreadsheets and accompanying reports
referenced under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii). The following
criteria shall be used by the state superintendent in the
administration of the education resource block grant model:
(G) Amounts within the block grant model
for maintenance and operations shall be based upon actual
gross square footage of school buildings and facilities
subject to the following:
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0034
ENROLLED ACT NO. 97, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(II) Actual gross square footage of
education space shall be the gross square footage
prescribed by statewide building adequacy standards
promulgated pursuant to W.S. 21-15-115. Except as otherwise
provided in this subdivision, education space capacity in
excess of one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the
standard space level shall not be included in actual gross
square footage computations under this subdivision. For
school year 2025-2026, education space capacity in excess
of one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the standard
space level shall not be included in actual gross square
footage computations under this subdivision;
21-15-109. Major building and facility repair and
replacement payments; computation; square footage
allowance; use of payment funds; accounting and reporting
requirements.
(c) To compute the major building and facility repair
and replacement payment for each district, the department
shall:
(iii) Except as otherwise provided by this
paragraph, adjust the total amount of gross square footage
determined for educational buildings under subparagraph
(c)(ii)(C) of this section by excluding from computations
under this section the square footage for those educational
buildings closed and not operational as provided for under
paragraph (c)(iv) of this section and any amount including
the gross square footage of portable buildings, which
exceeds capacity levels specified by this paragraph which
are above the statewide minimum gross square footage
criteria as prescribed by the statewide building and
facility adequacy standards promulgated under W.S.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0034
ENROLLED ACT NO. 97, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
21-15-115(a). For the purpose of adjusting the gross square
footage of educational buildings under this paragraph, the
gross square footage of buildings used for the provision of
certified child care, developmental preschool and
cooperative education programs pursuant to subparagraph
(c)(i)(A) of this section shall not be excluded. For
purposes of this section, per student gross square footage
criteria prescribed by the statewide building adequacy
standards shall be based upon an average daily membership
(ADM) computed as defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(i) for
the prior school year. For purposes of computations under
this section, the allowable capacity in educational
building gross square footage for each district including
portable buildings but excluding buildings used for the
provision of certified child care, developmental preschool
and cooperative education programs pursuant to subparagraph
(c)(i)(A) of this section, shall be as follows:
(C) For school year 2009-2010 and each
school year thereafter Except as otherwise provided in this
subparagraph, for each school year, up to one hundred
fifteen percent (115%) of the prescribed per student gross
square footage criteria. For school year 2025-2026, up to
one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the prescribed
per student gross square footage criteria.
(vi) Multiply the amount computed under
paragraph (c)(v) of this section for the adjusted square
footage of the district's educational buildings times two
and one-half percent (2.5%) for school year 2001-2002,
three percent (3%) for school year 2002-2003, and by two
percent (2%) for school year 2003-2004 2025-2026 and each
school year thereafter;
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0034
ENROLLED ACT NO. 97, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vii) Multiply the sum of the amounts obtained
under paragraph (c)(v) of this section for the building
categories identified under subparagraphs (c)(ii)(A) and
(D) of this section times two and one-half percent (2.5%)
for school year 2001-2002, three percent (3%) for school
year 2002-2003, and by two percent (2%) for school year
2003-2004 2025-2026 and each school year thereafter,
adjusted as follows:
Section 2. There is appropriated thirty-eight million
one hundred thousand dollars ($38,100,000.00) from the
public school foundation program account to the state
construction department for major maintenance payments to
school districts made necessary by the amendments enacted
in section 1 of this act. This appropriation shall be for
the period beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2026.
Section 3.
(a) There is appropriated from the public school
foundation program account twenty million dollars
($20,000,000.00) to the school facilities commission for
demolition, site preparation and construction necessary for
the completion of a high school building and facility
project in Campbell county school district #1. Any
disposition or demolition of buildings or facilities shall
be subject to commission approval and be included in the
district's facility plan to ensure the disposition or
demolition is in the financial interest of the state and is
in the public interest as required under W.S.
21-15-123(f)(vi). The amounts appropriated under this
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0034
ENROLLED ACT NO. 97, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
subsection shall remain in effect from the effective date
of this act until the high school building and facility
project in Campbell county school district #1 is complete.
Upon completion of the high school building and facility
project in Campbell county school district #1, any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from the
appropriation for the project shall revert to the public
school foundation program account.
(b) If 2025 House Bill 0259 is enacted into law, the
appropriation in subsection (a) of this section shall be
reduced by one dollar ($1.00) for every one dollar ($1.00)
appropriated to the school facilities commission for the
project specified in subsection (a) of this section in 2025
House Bill 0259.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0034
ENROLLED ACT NO. 97, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
6